Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4918
Investment, defined.

Investment means the value of qualified property incorporated into or used at the project after the date of the application. For qualified property owned by the company, the value is the original cost of the property. For qualified property rented by the company, the value is the average net annual rent multiplied by the number of years of the lease for which the company was originally bound, not to exceed ten years or the end of the third year after the entitlement period, whichever is earlier. The rental of land included in and incidental to the leasing of a building shall not be excluded from the computation.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 18.